Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 7503-1.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 7503-1.1. A. The following persons are eligible to
adopt a child:

Req. No. 15255 Page 1

1. A husband and wife jointly if both spouses are at least
twenty-one (21) years of age;
2. Either the husband or wife if the other spouse is a parent
or a relative of the child;
3. An unmarried person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of
age; or
4. A married person at least twenty-one (21) years of age who
is legally separated from the other spouse.
B. No person shall be denied the opportunity to become an
adoptive parent and the placement of a child for adoption shall not
be denied nor delayed on the basis of the adoptive parent's refusal,
unwillingness, or lack of support to enable the child to engage in a
gender transition.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 10A O.S. 2021, Section 1-1-105, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 375, O.S.L. 2025 (10A O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1-1-105), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-1-105. When used in the Oklahoma Children's Code,
unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Abandonment" means:
a. the willful intent by words, actions, or omissions not
to return for a child,
b. the failure to maintain a significant parental
relationship with a child through visitation or

Req. No. 15255 Page 2

communication in which incidental or token visits or
communication are not considered significant, or
c. the failure to respond to notice of deprived
proceedings;
2. "Abuse" means harm or threatened harm to the health, safety,
or welfare of a child by a person responsible for the child's
health, safety, or welfare, including, but not limited to,
nonaccidental physical or mental injury, sexual abuse, or sexual
exploitation. Provided, however, that nothing contained in the
Oklahoma Children's Code shall prohibit any parent from using
ordinary force as a means of discipline including, but not limited
to, spanking, switching, or paddling., and raising a juvenile
consistent with the juvenile's biological sex or referring to a
juvenile consistent with the juvenile's biological sex shall not
constitute abuse under this act:
a. "Harm or threatened harm to the health, safety, or
welfare of a child" means any real or threatened
physical, mental, or emotional injury or damage to the
body or mind that is not accidental including, but not
limited to, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation,
neglect, or dependency.,
b. "Sexual abuse" includes but is not limited to rape,
incest, and lewd or indecent acts or proposals made to

Req. No. 15255 Page 3

a child, as defined by law, by a person responsible
for the health, safety, or welfare of the child., and
c. "Sexual exploitation" includes but is not limited to
allowing, permitting, encouraging, or forcing a child
to engage in prostitution, as defined by law, by any
person eighteen (18) years of age or older or by a
person responsible for the health, safety, or welfare
of a child, or allowing, permitting, encouraging, or
engaging in the lewd, obscene, or pornographic, as
defined by law, photographing, filming, or depicting
of a child in those acts by a person responsible for
the health, safety, and welfare of the child;
3. "Adjudication" means a finding by the court that the
allegations in a petition alleging that a child is deprived are
supported by a preponderance of the evidence;
4. "Adjudicatory hearing" means a hearing by the court as
provided by Section 1-4-601 of this title;
5. "Age-appropriate or developmentally appropriate" means:
a. activities or items that are generally accepted as
suitable for children of the same age or level of
maturity or that are determined to be developmentally
appropriate for a child, based on the development of
cognitive, emotional, physical, and behavioral

Req. No. 15255 Page 4

capacities that are typical for an age or age group,
and
b. in the case of a specific child, activities or items
that are suitable for that child based on the
developmental stages attained by the child with
respect to the cognitive, emotional, physical, and
behavioral capacities of the specific child.
In the event that any age-related activities have implications
relative to the academic curriculum of a child, nothing in this
paragraph shall be construed to authorize an officer or employee of
the federal government to mandate, direct, or control a state or
local educational agency, or the specific instructional content,
academic achievement standards and assessments, curriculum, or
program of instruction of a school;
6. "Assessment" means a comprehensive review of child safety
and evaluation of family functioning and protective capacities that
is conducted in response to a child abuse or neglect referral that
does not allege a serious and immediate safety threat to a child;
7. "Behavioral health" means mental health, substance abuse, or
co-occurring mental health and substance abuse diagnoses, and the
continuum of mental health, substance abuse, or co-occurring mental
health and substance abuse treatment;
8. "Child" means any unmarried person under eighteen (18) years
of age;
Req. No. 15255 Page 5

9. "Child advocacy center" means a center and the
multidisciplinary child abuse team of which it is a member that is
accredited by the National Children's Alliance or that is completing
a sixth year of reaccreditation. Child advocacy centers shall be
classified, based on the child population of a district attorney's
district, as follows:
a. nonurban centers in districts with child populations
that are less than sixty thousand (60,000), and
b. mid-level nonurban centers in districts with child
populations equal to or greater than sixty thousand
(60,000), but not including Oklahoma and Tulsa
Counties;
10. "Child with a disability" means any child who has a
physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or more
of the major life activities of the child, or who is regarded as
having such an impairment by a competent medical professional;
11. "Child-placing agency" means an agency that arranges for or
places a child in a foster family home, family-style living program,
group home, adoptive home, or a successful adulthood program;
12. "Children's emergency resource center" means a community-
based program that may provide emergency care and a safe and
structured homelike environment or a host home for children
providing food, clothing, shelter and hygiene products to each child
served; after-school tutoring; counseling services; life-skills
Req. No. 15255 Page 6

trai ning; transition services; assessments; family reunification;
respite care; transportation to or from school, doctors'
appointments, visitations and other social, school, court or other
activities when necessary; and a stable environment for children in
crisis who are in custody of the Department of Human Services if
permitted under the Department's policies and regulations, or who
have been voluntarily placed by a parent or custodian during a
temporary crisis;
13. "Community-based services" or "community-based programs"
means services or programs which maintain community participation or
supervision in their planning, operation, and evaluation.
Community-based services and programs may include, but are not
limited to, emergency shelter, crisis intervention, group work, case
supervision, job placement, recruitment and training of volunteers,
consultation, medical, educational, home-based services, vocational,
social, preventive and psychological guidance, training, counseling,
early intervention and diversionary substance abuse treatment,
sexual abuse treatment, transitional living, independent living, and
other related services and programs;
14. "Concurrent permanency planning" means, when indicated, the
implementation of two plans for a child entering foster care. One
plan focuses on reuniting the parent and child; the other seeks to
find a permanent out-of-home placement for the child with both plans
being pursued simultaneously;
Req. No. 15255 Page 7

15. "Court-appointed special advocate" or "CASA" means a
responsible adult volunteer who has been trained and is supervised
by a court-appointed special advocate program recognized by the
court, and when appointed by the court, serves as an officer of the
court in the capacity as a guardian ad litem;
16. "Court-appointed special advocate program" means an
organized program, administered by either an independent, not-for-
profit corporation, a dependent project of an independent, not-for-
profit corporation or a unit of local government, which recruits,
screens, trains, assigns, supervises and supports volunteers to be
available for appointment by the court as guardians ad litem;
17. "Custodian" means an individual other than a parent, legal
guardian or Indian custodian, to whom legal custody of the child has
been awarded by the court. As used in this title, the term
custodian shall not mean the Department of Human Services;
18. "Day treatment" means a nonresidential program which
provides intensive services to a child who resides in the child's
own home, the home of a relative, a group home, a foster home, or a
residential child care facility. Day treatment programs include,
but are not limited to, educational services;
19. "Department" means the Department of Human Services;
20. "Dependency" means a child who is homeless or without
proper care or guardianship through no fault of his or her parent,
legal guardian, or custodian;
Req. No. 15255 Page 8

21. "Deprived child" means a child:
a. who is for any reason destitute, homeless, or
abandoned,
b. who does not have the proper parental care or
guardianship,
c. who has been abused or neglected or is dependent,
d. whose home is an unfit place for the child by reason
of depravity on the part of the parent or legal
guardian of the child, or other person responsible for
the health or welfare of the child,
e. who is a child in need of special care and treatment
because of the child's physical or mental condition,
and the child's parents, legal guardian, or other
custodian is unable or willfully fails to provide such
special care and treatment. As used in this
paragraph, a child in need of special care and
treatment includes, but is not limited to, a child who
at birth tests positive for alcohol or a controlled
dangerous substance and who, pursuant to a drug or
alcohol screen of the child and an assessment of the
parent, is determined to be at risk of harm or
threatened harm to the health, safety, or welfare of a
child,

Req. No. 15255 Page 9

f. who is a child with a disability deprived of the
nutrition necessary to sustain life or of the medical
treatment necessary to remedy or relieve a life-
threatening medical condition in order to cause or
allow the death of the child if such nutrition or
medical treatment is generally provided to similarly
situated children without a disability or children
with disabilities; provided that no medical treatment
shall be necessary if, in the reasonable medical
judgment of the attending physician, such treatment
would be futile in saving the life of the child,
g. who, due to improper parental care and guardianship,
is absent from school as specified in Section 10-106
of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, if the child is
subject to compulsory school attendance,
h. whose parent, legal guardian or custodian for good
cause desires to be relieved of custody,
i. who has been born to a parent whose parental rights to
another child have been involuntarily terminated by
the court and the conditions which led to the making
of the finding, which resulted in the termination of
the parental rights of the parent to the other child,
have not been corrected, or

Req. No. 15255 Page 10

j. whose parent, legal guardian, or custodian has
subjected another child to abuse or neglect or has
allowed another child to be subjected to abuse or
neglect and is currently a respondent in a deprived
proceeding.
Nothing in the Oklahoma Children's Code shall be construed to
mean a child is deprived for the sole reason the parent, legal
guardian, or person having custody or control of a child, in good
faith, selects and depends upon spiritual means alone through
prayer, in accordance with the tenets and practice of a recognized
church or religious denomination, for the treatment or cure of
disease or remedial care of such child.
Evidence of material, educational or cultural disadvantage as
compared to other children shall not be sufficient to prove that a
child is deprived; the state shall prove that the child is deprived
as defined pursuant to this title.
Nothing contained in this paragraph shall prevent a court from
immediately assuming custody of a child and ordering whatever action
may be necessary, including medical treatment, to protect the
child's health or welfare;
22. "Dispositional hearing" means a hearing by the court as
provided by Section 1-4-706 of this title;
23. "Drug-endangered child" means a child who is at risk of
suffering physical, psychological or sexual harm as a result of the
Req. No. 15255 Page 11

use, possession, distribution, manufacture or cultivation of
controlled substances, or the attempt of any of these acts, by a
person responsible for the health, safety or welfare of the child,
as defined in this section. This term includes circumstances
wherein the substance abuse of the person responsible for the
health, safety or welfare of the child interferes with that person's
ability to parent and provide a safe and nurturing environment for
the child;
24. "Emergency custody" means the custody of a child prior to
adjudication of the child following issuance of an order of the
district court pursuant to Section 1-4-201 of this title or
following issuance of an order of the district court pursuant to an
emergency custody hearing, as specified by Section 1-4-203 of this
title;
25. "Facility" means a place, an institution, a building or
part thereof, a set of buildings, or an area whether or not
enclosing a building or set of buildings used for the lawful custody
and treatment of children;
26. "Failure to protect" means failure to take reasonable
action to remedy or prevent child abuse or neglect, and includes the
conduct of a nonabusing parent or guardian who knows the identity of
the abuser or the person neglecting the child, but lies, conceals or
fails to report the child abuse or neglect or otherwise take
reasonable action to end the abuse or neglect;
Req. No. 15255 Page 12

27. "Family-style living program" means a residential program
providing sustained care and supervision to residents in a homelike
environment not located in a building used for commercial activity;
28. "Foster care" or "foster care services" means continuous
twenty-four-hour care and supportive services provided for a child
in foster placement including, but not limited to, the care,
supervision, guidance, and rearing of a foster child by the foster
parent;
29. "Foster family home" means the private residence of a
foster parent who provides foster care services to a child. Such
term shall include a nonkinship foster family home, a therapeutic
foster family home, or the home of a relative or other kinship care
home;
30. "Foster parent eligibility assessment" includes a criminal
background investigation including, but not limited to, a national
criminal history records search based upon the submission of
fingerprints, home assessments, and any other assessment required by
the Department of Human Services, the Office of Juvenile Affairs, or
any child-placing agency pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma
Child Care Facilities Licensing Act;
31. "Guardian ad litem" means a person appointed by the court
pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-4-306 of this title having
those duties and responsibilities as set forth in that section. The
term guardian ad litem shall refer to a court-appointed special
Req. No. 15255 Page 13

advo cate as well as to any other person appointed pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1-4-306 of this title to serve as a guardian
ad litem;
32. "Guardian ad litem of the estate of the child" means a
person appointed by the court to protect the property interests of a
child pursuant to Section 1-8-108 of this title;
33. "Group home" means a residential facility licensed by the
Department to provide full-time care and community-based services
for more than five but fewer than thirteen children;
34. "Harm or threatened harm to the health or safety of a
child" means any real or threatened physical, mental, or emotional
injury or damage to the body or mind that is not accidental
including, but not limited to, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation,
neglect, or dependency;
35. "Heinous and shocking abuse" includes, but is not limited
to, aggravated physical abuse that results in serious bodily,
mental, or emotional injury. "Serious bodily injury" means injury
that involves:
a. a substantial risk of death,
b. extreme physical pain,
c. protracted disfigurement,
d. a loss or impairment of the function of a body member,
organ, or mental faculty,

Req. No. 15255 Page 14

e. an injury to an internal or external organ or the
body,
f. a bone fracture,
g. sexual abuse or sexual exploitation,
h. chronic abuse including, but not limited to, physical,
emotional, or sexual abuse, or sexual exploitation
which is repeated or continuing,
i. torture that includes, but is not limited to,
inflicting, participating in or assisting in
inflicting intense physical or emotional pain upon a
child repeatedly over a period of time for the purpose
of coercing or terrorizing a child or for the purpose
of satisfying the craven, cruel, or prurient desires
of the perpetrator or another person, or
j. any other similar aggravated circumstance;
36. "Heinous and shocking neglect" includes, but is not limited
to:
a. chronic neglect that includes, but is not limited to,
a persistent pattern of family functioning in which
the caregiver has not met or sustained the basic needs
of a child which results in harm to the child,
b. neglect that has resulted in a diagnosis of the child
as a failure to thrive,

Req. No. 15255 Page 15

c. an act or failure to act by a parent that results in
the death or near death of a child or sibling, serious
physical or emotional harm, sexual abuse, or sexual
exploitation, or presents an imminent risk of serious
harm to a child, or
d. any other similar aggravating circumstance;
37. "Individualized service plan" means a document written
pursuant to Section 1-4-704 of this title that has the same meaning
as "service plan" or "treatment plan" where those terms are used in
the Oklahoma Children's Code;
38. "Infant" means a child who is twelve (12) months of age or
younger;
39. "Institution" means a residential facility offering care
and treatment for more than twenty residents;
40. a. "Investigation" means a response to an allegation of
abuse or neglect that involves a serious and immediate
threat to the safety of the child, making it necessary
to determine:
(1) the current safety of a child and the risk of
subsequent abuse or neglect, and
(2) whether child abuse or neglect occurred and
whether the family needs prevention- and
intervention-related services.

Req. No. 15255 Page 16

b. Investigation results in a written response stating
one of the following findings:
(1) "substantiated" means the Department has
determined, after an investigation of a report of
child abuse or neglect and based upon some
credible evidence, that child abuse or neglect
has occurred. When child abuse or neglect is
substantiated, the Department may recommend:
(a) court intervention if the Department finds
the health, safety, or welfare of the child
is threatened, or
(b) child abuse and neglect prevention- and
intervention-related services for the child,
parents or persons responsible for the care
of the child if court intervention is not
determined to be necessary,
(2) "unsubstantiated" means the Department has
determined, after an investigation of a report of
child abuse or neglect, that insufficient
evidence exists to fully determine whether child
abuse or neglect has occurred. If child abuse or
neglect is unsubstantiated, the Department may
recommend, when determined to be necessary, that
the parents or persons responsible for the care
Req. No. 15255 Page 17

of the child obtain child abuse and neglect
prevention- and intervention-related services, or
(3) "ruled out" means a report in which a child
protective services specialist has determined,
after an investigation of a report of child abuse
or neglect, that no child abuse or neglect has
occurred;
41. "Kinship care" means full-time care of a child by a kinship
relation;
42. "Kinship guardianship" means a permanent guardianship as
defined in this section;
43. "Kinship relation" or "kinship relationship" means
relatives, stepparents, or other responsible adults who have a bond
or tie with a child or to whom has been ascribed a family
relationship role with the child's parents or the child; provided,
however, in cases where the Indian Child Welfare Act applies, the
definitions contained in 25 U.S.C., Section 1903 shall control;
44. "Mental health facility" means a mental health or substance
abuse treatment facility as defined by the Inpatient Mental Health
and Substance Abuse Treatment of Minors Act;
45. "Minor" means the same as the term child as defined in this
section;


Req. No. 15255 Page 18

46. "Minor in need of treatment" means a child in need of
mental health or substance abuse treatment as defined by the
Inpatient Mental Health and Substance Abuse Treatment of Minors Act;
47. "Multidisciplinary child abuse team" means any team
established pursuant to Section 1-9-102 of this title of three or
more persons who are trained in the prevention, identification,
investigation, prosecution, and treatment of physical and sexual
child abuse and who are qualified to facilitate a broad range of
prevention- and intervention-related services and services related
to child abuse. For purposes of this definition, "freestanding"
means a team not used by a child advocacy center for its
accreditation;
48. "Near death" means a child is in serious or critical
condition, as certified by a physician, as a result of abuse or
neglect;
49. a. "Neglect" means:
(1) the failure or omission to provide any of the
following:
(a) adequate nurturance and affection, food,
clothing, shelter, sanitation, hygiene, or
appropriate education,
(b) medical, dental, or behavioral health care,
(c) supervision or appropriate caretakers to
protect the child from harm or threatened
Req. No. 15255 Page 19

harm of which any reasonable and prudent
person responsible for the child's health,
safety or welfare would be aware, or
(d) special care made necessary for the child's
health and safety by the physical or mental
condition of the child,
(2) the failure or omission to protect a child from
exposure to any of the following:
(a) the use, possession, sale, or manufacture of
illegal drugs,
(b) illegal activities, or
(c) sexual acts or materials that are not age-
appropriate, or
(3) abandonment.
b. Neglect shall not mean:
(1) a child who engages in independent activities,
except if the person responsible for the child's
health, safety or welfare willfully disregards
any harm or threatened harm to the child, given
the child's level of maturity, physical condition
or mental abilities. Such independent activities
include but are not limited to:
(1)

Req. No. 15255 Page 20

(a) traveling to and from school including by
walking, running or bicycling,
(2)
(b) traveling to and from nearby commercial or
recreational facilities,
(3)
(c) engaging in outdoor play,
(4)
(d) remaining at home unattended for a
reasonable amount of time,
(5)
(e) remaining in a vehicle if the temperature
inside the vehicle is not or will not become
dangerously hot or cold, except under the
conditions described in Section 11-1119 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, or
(6)
(f) engaging in similar activities alone or with
other children; or
(2) raising a juvenile consistent with the juvenile's
biological sex or referring to a juvenile consistent with the
juvenile's biological sex.
Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to mean a child is
abused or neglected for the sole reason the parent, legal guardian
Req. No. 15255 Page 21

or p erson having custody or control of a child, in good faith,
selects and depends upon spiritual means alone through prayer, in
accordance with the tenets and practice of a recognized church or
religious denomination, for the treatment or cure of disease or
remedial care of such child. Nothing contained in this paragraph
shall prevent a court from immediately assuming custody of a child,
pursuant to the Oklahoma Children's Code, and ordering whatever
action may be necessary, including medical treatment, to protect the
child's health or welfare;
50. "Permanency hearing" means a hearing by the court pursuant
to Section 1-4-811 of this title;
51. "Permanent custody" means the court-ordered custody of an
adjudicated deprived child when a parent-child relationship no
longer exists due to termination of parental rights or due to the
death of a parent or parents;
52. "Permanent guardianship" means a judicially created
relationship between a child, a kinship relation of the child, or
other adult established pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-4-
709 of this title;
53. "Person responsible for a child's health, safety, or
welfare" includes a parent; a legal guardian; custodian; a foster
parent; a person eighteen (18) years of age or older with whom the
child's parent cohabitates or any other adult residing in the home
of the child; an agent or employee of a public or private
Req. No. 15255 Page 22

resi dential home, institution, facility or day treatment program as
defined in Section 175.20 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or
an owner, operator, or employee of a child care facility as defined
by Section 402 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
54. "Plan of safe care" means a plan developed for an infant
with Neonatal Abstinence Syndrome or a Fetal Alcohol Spectrum
Disorder upon release from the care of a health care provider that
addresses the health and substance use treatment needs of the infant
and mother or caregiver;
55. "Protective custody" means custody of a child taken by a
law enforcement officer or designated employee of the court without
a court order;
56. "Putative father" means an alleged father as that term is
defined in Section 7700-102 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
57. "Qualified residential treatment program" means a program
that:
a. has a trauma-informed treatment model that is designed
to address the needs including clinical needs as
appropriate, of children with serious emotional or
behavioral disorders or disturbances and, with respect
to a child, is able to implement the treatment
identified for the child from a required assessment,
b. has registered or licensed nursing staff and other
licensed clinical staff who:
Req. No. 15255 Page 23

(1) provide care within the scope of their practice
as defined by the laws of this state,
(2) are on-site according to the treatment model
referred to in subparagraph a of this paragraph,
and
(3) are available twenty-four (24) hours a day and
seven (7) days a week,
c. to the extent appropriate, and in accordance with the
child's best interest, facilitates participation of
family members in the child's treatment program,
d. facilitates outreach to the family members of the
child including siblings, documents how the outreach
is made including contact information, and maintains
contact information for any known biological family of
the child,
e. documents how family members are integrated into the
treatment process for the child including post-
discharge, and how sibling connections are maintained,
f. provides discharge planning and family-based aftercare
support for at least six (6) months post-discharge,
and
g. is licensed and accredited by any of the following
independent, not-for-profit organizations:

Req. No. 15255 Page 24

(1) the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation
Facilities (CARF),
(2) the Joint Commission,
(3) the Council on Accreditation (COA), or
(4) any other federally approved independent, not-
for-profit accrediting organization;
58. "Reasonable and prudent parent standard" means the standard
characterized by careful and sensible parental decisions that
maintain the health, safety, and best interests of a child while at
the same time encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of
the child. This standard shall be used by the child's caregiver
when determining whether to allow a child to participate in
extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities. For
purposes of this definition, the term "caregiver" means a foster
parent with whom a child in foster care has been placed, a
representative of a group home where a child has been placed or a
designated official for a residential child care facility where a
child in foster care has been placed;
59. "Relative" means a grandparent, great-grandparent, brother
or sister of whole or half blood, aunt, uncle or any other person
related to the child;
60. "Residential child care facility" means a twenty-four-hour
residential facility where children live together with or are
supervised by adults who are not their parents or relatives;
Req. No. 15255 Page 25

61. "Review hearing" means a hearing by the court pursuant to
Section 1-4-807 of this title;
62. "Risk" means the likelihood that an incident of child abuse
or neglect will occur in the future;
63. "Safety threat" means the threat of serious harm due to
child abuse or neglect occurring in the present or in the very near
future and without the intervention of another person, a child would
likely or in all probability sustain severe or permanent disability
or injury, illness, or death;
64. "Safety analysis" means action taken by the Department in
response to a report of alleged child abuse or neglect that may
include an assessment or investigation based upon an analysis of the
information received according to priority guidelines and other
criteria adopted by the Department;
65. "Safety evaluation" means evaluation of a child's situation
by the Department using a structured, evidence-based tool to
determine if the child is subject to a safety threat;
66. "Secure facility" means a facility which is designed and
operated to ensure that all entrances and exits from the facility
are subject to the exclusive control of the staff of the facility,
whether or not the juvenile being detained has freedom of movement
within the perimeter of the facility, or a facility which relies on
locked rooms and buildings, fences, or physical restraint in order
to control behavior of its residents;
Req. No. 15255 Page 26

67. "Sibling" means a biologically or legally related brother
or sister of a child. This includes an individual who satisfies at
least one of the following conditions with respect to a child:
a. the individual is considered by state law to be a
sibling of the child, or
b. the individual would have been considered a sibling
under state law but for a termination or other
disruption of parental rights, such as the death of a
parent;
68. "Specialized foster care" means foster care provided to a
child in a foster home or agency-contracted home which:
a. has been certified by the Developmental Disabilities
Services Division of the Department of Human Services,
b. is monitored by the Division, and
c. is funded through the Home and Community-Based Waiver
Services Program administered by the Division;
69. "Successful adulthood program" means a program specifically
designed to assist a child to enhance those skills and abilities
necessary for successful adult living. A successful adulthood
program may include, but shall not be limited to, such features as
minimal direct staff supervision, and the provision of supportive
services to assist children with activities necessary for finding an
appropriate place of residence, completing an education or

Req. No. 15255 Page 27

voca tional training, obtaining employment, or obtaining other
similar services;
70. "Temporary custody" means court-ordered custody of an
adjudicated deprived child;
71. "Therapeutic foster family home" means a foster family home
which provides specific treatment services, pursuant to a
therapeutic foster care contract, which are designed to remedy
social and behavioral problems of a foster child residing in the
home;
72. "Time-limited reunification services" means reunification
services provided only during the period of fifteen (15) months that
begins on the date the child is considered to have entered foster
care;
73. "Trafficking in persons" means sex trafficking or severe
forms of trafficking in persons as described in Section 7102 of
Title 22 of the United States Code:
a. "sex trafficking" means the recruitment, harboring,
transportation, provision, obtaining, patronizing or
soliciting of a person for the purpose of a commercial
sex act, and
b. "severe forms of trafficking in persons" means:
(1) sex trafficking in which a commercial sex act is
induced by force, fraud, or coercion, or in which

Req. No. 15255 Page 28

the person induced to perform such act has not
attained eighteen (18) years of age, or
(2) the recruitment, harboring, transportation,
provision, obtaining, patronizing or soliciting
of a person for labor or services, through the
use of force, fraud, or coercion for the purpose
of subjection to involuntary servitude, peonage,
debt bondage, or slavery;
74. "Transitional living program" means a residential program
that may be attached to an existing facility or operated solely for
the purpose of assisting children to develop the skills and
abilities necessary for successful adult living. The program may
include, but shall not be limited to, reduced staff supervision,
vocational training, educational services, employment and employment
training, and other appropriate independent living skills training
as a part of the transitional living program; and
75. "Voluntary foster care placement" means the temporary
placement of a child by the parent, legal guardian or custodian of
the child in foster care pursuant to a signed placement agreement
between the Department or a child-placing agency and the child's
parent, legal guardian or custodian.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 843.5, as
last amended by Section 8, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 843.5), is amended to read as follows:
Req. No. 15255 Page 29

Section 843.5. A. Any person who shall willfully or
maliciously engage in child abuse, as defined in this section,
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense
punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections not exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a
county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less
than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment.
B. Any person responsible for the health, safety or welfare of
a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in enabling child
abuse, as defined in this section, shall, upon conviction, be guilty
of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections not exceeding life
imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one
(1) year, or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both
such fine and imprisonment.
C. Any person responsible for the health, safety or welfare of
a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in child neglect,
as defined in this section, shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
Class B1 felony offense and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections not exceeding life
imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one
(1) year, or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars
Req. No. 15255 Page 30

($50 0.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both
such fine and imprisonment.
D. Any parent or other person who shall willfully or
maliciously engage in enabling child neglect shall, upon conviction,
be guilty of a Class B1 felony offense and shall be punished by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections not
exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county jail not
exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred
Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00),
or both such fine and imprisonment.
E. Any person responsible for the health, safety or welfare of
a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in child sexual
abuse, as defined in this section, shall, upon conviction, be guilty
of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections not exceeding life
imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one
(1) year, or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both
such fine and imprisonment, except as provided in Section 51.1a of
this title or as otherwise provided in subsection F of this section
for a child victim under twelve (12) years of age. Except for
persons sentenced to life or life without parole, any person
sentenced to imprisonment for two (2) years or more for a violation
of this subsection shall be required to serve a term of post-
Req. No. 15255 Page 31

impr isonment supervision pursuant to subparagraph f of paragraph 1
of subsection A of Section 991a of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes
under conditions determined by the Department of Corrections. The
jury shall be advised that the mandatory post-imprisonment
supervision shall be in addition to the actual imprisonment.
F. Any person responsible for the health, safety or welfare of
a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in child sexual
abuse, as defined in this section, to a child under twelve (12)
years of age shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class A1 felony
offense and shall be punished by imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections for not less than twenty-five (25) years
nor more than life imprisonment, and by a fine of not less than Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00).
G. Any parent or other person who shall willfully or
maliciously engage in enabling child sexual abuse shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections not exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a
county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less
than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment.
H. Any person who shall willfully or maliciously engage in
child sexual exploitation, as defined in this section, shall, upon
Req. No. 15255 Page 32

conv iction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections not exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a
county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less
than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment, except as
provided in subsection I of this section for a child victim under
twelve (12) years of age. Except for persons sentenced to life or
life without parole, any person sentenced to imprisonment for two
(2) years or more for a violation of this subsection shall be
required to serve a term of post-imprisonment supervision pursuant
to subparagraph f of paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 991a of
Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes under conditions determined by the
Department of Corrections. The jury shall be advised that the
mandatory post-imprisonment supervision shall be in addition to the
actual imprisonment.
I. Any person who shall willfully or maliciously engage in
child sexual exploitation, as defined in this section, of a child
under twelve (12) years of age shall, upon conviction, be guilty of
a Class A1 felony offense and shall be punished by imprisonment in
the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than
twenty-five (25) years nor more than life imprisonment, and by a
fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than
Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).
Req. No. 15255 Page 33

J. Any person responsible for the health, safety or welfare of
a child who shall willfully or maliciously engage in enabling child
sexual exploitation, as defined in this section, shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a Class A3 felony offense and shall be
punished by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections not exceeding life imprisonment, or by imprisonment in a
county jail not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine of not less
than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such fine and imprisonment.
K. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person
convicted of forcible anal or oral sodomy, rape, rape by
instrumentation, or lewd molestation of a child under fourteen (14)
years of age subsequent to a previous conviction for any offense of
forcible anal or oral sodomy, rape, rape by instrumentation, or lewd
molestation of a child under fourteen (14) years of age shall be
guilty of a Class A1 felony offense and shall be punished by death
or by imprisonment for life without parole.
L. Provided, however, that nothing contained in this section
shall prohibit any parent or guardian from using reasonable and
ordinary force pursuant to Section 844 of this title.
M. Consent shall not be a defense for any violation provided
for in this section.


Req. No. 15255 Page 34

N. Notwithstanding the age requirements of other statutes
referenced within this section, this section shall apply to any
child under eighteen (18) years of age.
O. As used in this section:
1. "Child abuse" means:
a. the willful or malicious harm or threatened harm or
failure to protect from harm or threatened harm to the
health, safety or welfare of a child under eighteen
(18) years of age by a person responsible for a
child's health, safety or welfare, or
b. the act of willfully or maliciously injuring,
torturing or maiming a child under eighteen (18) years
of age by any person;
2. "Child neglect" means the willful or malicious neglect, as
defined by Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, of
a child under eighteen (18) years of age by a person responsible for
a child's health, safety or welfare;
3. "Child sexual abuse" means the willful or malicious sexual
abuse of a child under eighteen (18) years of age by a person
responsible for a child's health, safety or welfare and includes,
but is not limited to:
a. sexual intercourse,


Req. No. 15255 Page 35

b. penetration of the vagina or anus, however slight, by
an inanimate object or any part of the human body not
amounting to sexual intercourse,
c. sodomy,
d. incest, or
e. a lewd act or proposal, as defined in this section;
4. "Child sexual exploitation" means the willful or malicious
sexual exploitation of a child under eighteen (18) years of age by
another and includes, but is not limited to:
a. human trafficking, as provided for in Section 748 of
this title, if the offense involved child trafficking
for commercial sex,
b. trafficking in children, as provided for in Section
866 of this title, if the offense was committed for
the sexual gratification of any person,
c. procuring or causing the participation of a minor in
child pornography, as provided for in Section 1021.2
of this title,
d. purchase, procurement or possession of child
pornography, as provided for in Section 1024.2 of this
title,
e. engaging in or soliciting prostitution, as provided
for in Section 1029 of this title, if the offense
involved child sex trafficking,
Req. No. 15255 Page 36

f. publication, distribution or participation in the
preparation of obscene material, as provided for in
Section 1040.8 of this title, if the offense involved
child pornography,
g. aggravated possession of child pornography, as
provided for in Section 1040.12a of this title,
h. sale or distribution of obscene material, as provided
for in Section 1040.13 of this title,
i. soliciting sexual conduct or communication with a
minor by use of technology, as provided for in Section
1040.13a of this title,
j. offering or transporting a child for purposes of child
sex trafficking, as provided for in Section 1087 of
this title, and
k. child sex trafficking, as provided for in Section 1088
of this title;
5. "Enabling child abuse" means the causing, procuring or
permitting of child abuse by a person responsible for a child's
health, safety or welfare;
6. "Enabling child neglect" means the causing, procuring or
permitting of child neglect by a person responsible for a child's
health, safety or welfare;


Req. No. 15255 Page 37

7. "Enabling child sexual abuse" means the causing, procuring
or permitting of child sexual abuse by a person responsible for a
child's health, safety or welfare;
8. "Enabling child sexual exploitation" means the causing,
procuring or permitting of child sexual exploitation by a person
responsible for a child's health, safety or welfare;
9. "Incest" means marrying, committing adultery or fornicating
with a child by a person responsible for the health, safety or
welfare of a child;
10. "Lewd act or proposal" means:
a. making any oral, written or electronic or computer-
generated lewd or indecent proposal to a child for the
child to have unlawful sexual relations or sexual
intercourse with any person,
b. looking upon, touching, mauling or feeling the body or
private parts of a child in a lewd or lascivious
manner or for the purpose of sexual gratification,
c. asking, inviting, enticing or persuading any child to
go alone with any person to a secluded, remote or
secret place for a lewd or lascivious purpose,
d. urinating or defecating upon a child or causing,
forcing or requiring a child to defecate or urinate
upon the body or private parts of another person for
the purpose of sexual gratification,
Req. No. 15255 Page 38

e. ejaculating upon or in the presence of a child,
f. causing, exposing, forcing or requiring a child to
look upon the body or private parts of another person
for the purpose of sexual gratification,
g. causing, forcing or requiring any child to view any
obscene materials, child pornography or materials
deemed harmful to minors as such terms are defined in
Sections 1024.1 and 1040.75 of this title,
h. causing, exposing, forcing or requiring a child to
look upon sexual acts performed in the presence of the
child for the purpose of sexual gratification, or
i. causing, forcing or requiring a child to touch or feel
the body or private parts of the child or another
person for the purpose of sexual gratification;
11. "Permit" means to authorize or allow for the care of a
child by an individual when the person authorizing or allowing such
care knows or reasonably should know that the child will be placed
at risk of the conduct or harm proscribed by this section;
12. "Person responsible for a child's health, safety or
welfare" for purposes of this section shall include, but not be
limited to:
a. the parent of the child,
b. the legal guardian of the child,
c. the custodian of the child,
Req. No. 15255 Page 39

d. the foster parent of the child,
e. a person eighteen (18) years of age or older with whom
the parent of the child cohabitates, who is at least
three (3) years older than the child,
f. any other person eighteen (18) years of age or older
residing in the home of the child, who is at least
three (3) years older than the child,
g. an owner, operator, agent, employee or volunteer of a
public or private residential home, institution,
facility or day treatment program, as defined in
Section 175.20 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
that the child attended,
h. an owner, operator, agent, employee or volunteer of a
child care facility, as defined in Section 402 of
Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes, that the child
attended,
i. an intimate partner of the parent of the child, as
defined in Section 60.1 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, or
j. a person who has voluntarily accepted responsibility
for the care or supervision of a child;
13. "Sexual intercourse" means the actual penetration, however
slight, of the vagina or anus by the penis; and
14. "Sodomy" means:
Req. No. 15255 Page 40

a. penetration, however slight, of the mouth of the child
by a penis,
b. penetration, however slight, of the vagina of a person
responsible for a child's health, safety or welfare,
by the mouth of a child,
c. penetration, however slight, of the mouth of the
person responsible for a child's health, safety or
welfare by the penis of the child, or
d. penetration, however slight, of the vagina of the
child by the mouth of the person responsible for a
child's health, safety or welfare.
P. Raising a juvenile consistent with the juvenile's biological
sex or referring to a juvenile consistent with the juvenile's
biological sex shall not constitute child abuse or child neglect
under this act.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 852.1, as
amended by Section 187, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 852.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 852.1. A. A person who is the parent, guardian, or
person having custody or control over a child as defined in Section
1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, commits child
endangerment when the person:
1. Knowingly permits physical or sexual abuse of a child;

Req. No. 15255 Page 41

2. Knowingly permits a child to be present at a location where
a controlled dangerous substance is being manufactured or attempted
to be manufactured as defined in Section 2-101 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Knowingly permits a child to be present in a vehicle when
the person knows or should have known that the operator of the
vehicle is impaired by or is under the influence of alcohol or
another intoxicating substance; or
4. Is the driver, operator, or person in physical control of a
vehicle in violation of Section 11-902 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma
Statutes while transporting or having in the vehicle such child or
children.
However, it is an affirmative defense to this paragraph if the
person had a reasonable apprehension that any action to stop the
physical or sexual abuse or deny permission for the child to be in
the vehicle with an intoxicated person would result in substantial
bodily harm to the person or the child.
Provided, however, that raising a juvenile consistent with the
juvenile's biological sex or referring to a juvenile consistent with
the juvenile's biological sex shall not constitute child
endangerment under this act.
Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the prosecution of a
person pursuant to the provisions of Section 11-902 or 11-904 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
Req. No. 15255 Page 42

B. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any
parent, guardian or other person having custody or control of a
child for the sole reason that the parent, guardian or other person
in good faith selects and depends upon spiritual means or prayer for
the treatment or cure of disease or remedial care for such child.
This subsection shall in no way limit or modify the protections
afforded said child in Section 852 of this title or Section 1-4-904
of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. Any person convicted of violating any provision of this
section shall be guilty of a Class B6 felony offense punishable by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a
term of not more than four (4) years, or by a fine not exceeding
Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15255 CMA 12/31/25







Req. No. 15255 Page 43